test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-lex-der-moonnad_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - moonnâđ: # ML checked

    moonnâđ+V+Inf: moonnâđ
    moonnâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Inf: monnuđ
    moonnâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: monnuum
    moonnâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: monnuuh
    moonnâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: mannoo
    moonnâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: mannojeen
    moonnâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: monnuuvettee
    moonnâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: monnuv
    moonnâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: monnup
    moonnâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: monnuuvetteđ
    moonnâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: mannojeh
    moonnâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: mannojim
    moonnâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: mannojih
    moonnâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: monnui
    moonnâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: monnuim
    moonnâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: monnuid
    moonnâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: monnuin
    moonnâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: monnuim
    moonnâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: monnuid
    moonnâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: mannojii
    moonnâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1: monnuuččim
    moonnâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Sg2: monnuuččih
    moonnâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3: monnuuččij
    moonnâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Du1: monnuuččáim
    moonnâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Du2: monnuuččáid
    moonnâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Du3: monnuuččáin
    moonnâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Pl1: monnuuččijm
    moonnâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Pl2: monnuuččijd
    moonnâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Pl3: monnuuččii
#    moonnâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Sg1: monnuužeem
#    moonnâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Sg2: monnuužeeh
##    moonnâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Sg3: moonuš
#    moonnâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Du1: monnuužeen
#    moonnâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Du2: moonušvettee
#    moonnâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Du3: monnuužává
#    moonnâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Pl1: monnuužep
#    moonnâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Pl2: moonušvetteđ
#    moonnâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Pl3: monnuužeh
    moonnâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: monnuu
    moonnâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: monnum
    moonnâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+ConNeg: monnuuččii
#    moonnâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+ConNeg: monnuužii
#    moonnâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+PrsPrc: [monnojijjee, monnojeijee]
    moonnâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+PrfPrc: monnum #Lene added moonnum; MLO: aborted
    moonnâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Actio+Nom: monnum
    moonnâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Actio+Ess: monnuumin
    moonnâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Actio+Loc: monnuumist
    moonnâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Actio+Ill: monnuumân
    moonnâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ger: monnuudijn
    moonnâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+VAbess: monnuuhánnáá
    moonnâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: monâdâm
    moonnâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: monâdah
    moonnâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: moonâd
    moonnâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: monâdeen
    moonnâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: moonâdvettee
    moonnâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: monâdává
    moonnâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: monâdeh
    moonnâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: moonâd
    moonnâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: monâdim
    moonnâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: monâdij
    moonnâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: monâdii
    moonnâđ+V+Der/d+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1: monâdiččim
    moonnâđ+V+Der/d+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3: monâdičij
    moonnâđ+V+Der/d+V+Pot+Prs+Sg1: monâdižžeem
    moonnâđ+V+Der/d+V+Pot+Prs+Sg3: monâdiš
    moonnâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: moonâd
    moonnâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: monâdâm
    moonnâđ+V+Der/d+V+Pot+Prs+ConNeg: monâdižžii
    moonnâđ+V+Der/d+V+PrfPrc: monâdâm
    moonnâđ+V+Der/d+V+VAbess: moonâdhánnáá
    moonnâđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Nom: monâdem
    moonnâđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Ill: moonâdmân
    moonnâđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Ess: moonâdmin
    moonnâđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Loc: moonâdmist
    moonnâđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Com: moonâddijn
    moonnâđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Com+PxSg1: moonâddijnân
    moonnâđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Com+PxSg2: moonâddijnâd
    moonnâđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Com+PxSg3: moonâddijnis
    moonnâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ger: moonâddijn
    moonnâđ+V+Der/st+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: monâstâm
    moonnâđ+V+Der/tt+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: monâttâm
    moonnâđ+V+Der/InchL+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: monâškuáđám
    moonnâđ+V+Der/l+V+Inf: monâliđ
    moonnâđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: monâlâm
    moonnâđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: moonnâl
    moonnâđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: monâleen
    moonnâđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: monâleh
    moonnâđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: moonnâl
    moonnâđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: monâlim
    moonnâđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: monâlij
    moonnâđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: monâlii

  Verb - puurrâđ: # ML checked

    puurrâđ+V+Inf: puurrâđ
    puurrâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Inf: purruđ
    puurrâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: purruum
    puurrâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: purruuh
    puurrâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: porroo
    puurrâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: porrojeen
    puurrâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: purruuvettee
    puurrâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: purruv
    puurrâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: purrup
    puurrâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: purruuvetteđ
    puurrâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: porrojeh
    puurrâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: porrojim
    puurrâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: porrojih
    puurrâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: purrui
    puurrâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: purruim
    puurrâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: purruid
    puurrâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: purruin
    puurrâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: purruim
    puurrâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: purruid
    puurrâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: porrojii
    puurrâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1: purruuččim
    puurrâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Sg2: purruuččih
    puurrâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3: purruuččij
    puurrâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Du1: purruuččáim
    puurrâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Du2: purruuččáid
    puurrâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Du3: purruuččáin
    puurrâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Pl1: purruuččijm
    puurrâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Pl2: purruuččijd
    puurrâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Pl3: purruuččii
    puurrâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Sg1: purruužeem
    puurrâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Sg2: purruužeeh
#    puurrâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Sg3: purruš
    puurrâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Du1: purruužeen
    puurrâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Du2: purrušvettee
    puurrâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Du3: purruužává
    puurrâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Pl1: purruužep
    puurrâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Pl2: purrušvetteđ
    puurrâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Pl3: purruužeh
    puurrâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: purruu
    puurrâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: purrum
    puurrâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+ConNeg: purruuččii
    puurrâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+ConNeg: purruužii
    puurrâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+PrsPrc: [porrojeijee, porrojijjee]
    puurrâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+PrfPrc: purrum #Lene added puurrum; MLO: aborted
    puurrâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Actio+Nom: purrum
    puurrâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Actio+Ess: purruumin
    puurrâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Actio+Loc: purruumist
    puurrâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Actio+Ill: purruumân
    puurrâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ger: purruudijn
    puurrâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+VAbess: purruuhánnáá
    puurrâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: purâdâm
    puurrâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: purâdah
    puurrâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: puurâd
    puurrâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: purâdeen
    puurrâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: puurâdvettee
    puurrâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: purâdává
    puurrâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: purâdeh
    puurrâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: puurâd
    puurrâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: purâdim
    puurrâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: purâdij
    puurrâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: purâdii
    puurrâđ+V+Der/d+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1: purâdiččim
    puurrâđ+V+Der/d+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3: purâdičij
    puurrâđ+V+Der/d+V+Pot+Prs+Sg1: purâdižžeem
    puurrâđ+V+Der/d+V+Pot+Prs+Sg3: purâdiš
    puurrâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: puurâd
    puurrâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: purâdâm
    puurrâđ+V+Der/d+V+Pot+Prs+ConNeg: purâdižžii
    puurrâđ+V+Der/d+V+PrfPrc: purâdâm
    puurrâđ+V+Der/d+V+VAbess: puurâdhánnáá
    puurrâđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Nom: purâdem
    puurrâđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Ill: puurâdmân
    puurrâđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Ess: puurâdmin
    puurrâđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Loc: puurâdmist
    puurrâđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Com: puurâddijn
    puurrâđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Com+PxSg1: puurâddijnân
    puurrâđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Com+PxSg2: puurâddijnâd
    puurrâđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Com+PxSg3: puurâddijnis
    puurrâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ger: puurâddijn
    puurrâđ+V+Der/st+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: purâstâm
    puurrâđ+V+Der/tt+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: purâttâm
    puurrâđ+V+Der/InchL+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: purâškuáđám
    puurrâđ+V+Der/l+V+Inf: purâliđ
    puurrâđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: purâlâm
    puurrâđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: puurrâl
    puurrâđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: purâleen
    puurrâđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: purâleh
    puurrâđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: puurrâl
    puurrâđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: purâlim
    puurrâđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: purâlij
    puurrâđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: purâlii
